Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Wyoming Real Estate Recovery and Education Funds

§ 33-28-201.
Real estate recovery account created; funding of account; no liability of state.

There is created a real estate recovery account which shall be under the direction of the commission under W.S.

33-28-201

through

33-28-206

.

Every person obtaining or renewing a license shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) which shall be deposited in the real estate recovery fund account. When the balance of the real estate recovery fund account reaches twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) one-half (1/2) of the fee shall be deposited in the real estate recovery fund account and one-half (1/2) of the fee shall be deposited in the educational fund account. When the real estate recovery fund account balance reaches fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) all fees shall be deposited in the education fund account.

No monies shall be appropriated from the general fund for payment of any expenses incurred under W.S.

33-28-201

through

33-28-206

and those expenses shall not be paid by the state.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “recovery account” in (a).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “Every person obtaining or renewing a” for “Beginning January 1, 2984, every person obtaining or renewing a real estate broker's, associated broker's or salesman's.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Transactions within public security or guaranty fund designed to compensate those suffering damage or loss on account of real-estate brokers' defalcations, 38 ALR4th 792.

Liability of vendor or real-estate broker for failure to disclose information concerning off-site conditions affecting value of property, 41 ALR5th 157.

§ 33-28-202.
Real estate recovery account created; payments; pro rata distribution when account insufficient; service of process; joinder of account.

If any person obtains a final judgment in any court of competent jurisdiction against any licensee on the grounds of fraud, willful misrepresentation, deceit or conversion of trust funds arising directly out of any transaction which occurred when the licensee was licensed by the commission and in which the licensee performed any real estate activity, that person, within one (1) year of termination of all proceedings, including appeals, may file with the commission a verified petition in the court in which the judgment was entered for an order directing payment out of the real estate recovery account in the amount of actual damages included in the judgment and unpaid, and that a writ of execution has been returned unsatisfied, but for not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00).

If the payment from the real estate recovery account is insufficient to pay in full the valid claims of all who have claims on file at any time the money in the account shall be distributed among them in the ratio that their respective claims bear to the aggregate of the valid claims or in a manner that a court deems equitable. Distribution of any monies shall be among the persons entitled to share the monies without regard to the order of priority in which their respective judgments were obtained or their claims were filed.

Any licensee who cannot personally be served with a copy of a summons and complaint through reasonable diligence, shall be deemed to have appointed the director of the commission as his agent for service of process for purposes of actions filed against him pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Service of process pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be made under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

In lieu of the petition under subsection (a) of this section for an order directing payment out of the real estate recovery account, a person filing an action against a licensee of a type described in subsection (a) of this section may join the real estate recovery account as a limited third party defendant and have judgment rendered directly against the account in the amount provided in subsection (a) of this section provided:

Service of summons and complaint is made on the real estate commission;

The account may assert all defenses available to defendant licensee;

Plaintiff posts a bond in the amount of ten percent (10%) of the actual damages he seeks from the account to guarantee costs.

The commission may defend any action against the fund on behalf of the fund and in the name of the defendant.

Recovery against the bond required in paragraph (d)(iii) of this section shall be authorized by the court if it rules in favor of the commission on behalf of the fund.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

As to the director of the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

As to service of process, see W.R.C.P., Rule 4.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “licensee” for “real estate broker or real estate salesman licensed under this act” or variants, substituted “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” for “four thousand dollars ($4,000.00),” and made stylistic changes; in (c), substituted “licensee who cannot personally be served with a copy of a summons and complaint through” for “real estate broker, associate broker or real estate salesman who is licensed or renews his license under W.S.

33-28-108

after December 31, 1983, and upon whom personal service cannot be made with”; and in (d), substituted “licensee” for “licensed real estate broker, associate broker or salesman.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
in (a), added “by the commission” near the middle.

§ 33-28-203.
Limitation on action for payment from account; notice of action; order of payment; showing required.

No order for payment from the real estate recovery account shall be issued unless the suit in which the order subsequently results was commenced within one (1) year after the cause of action accrued. If any person commences an action for a judgment which may result in an order for payment from the account, the person shall notify the commission in writing of the commencement of the action. The commission, under W.S.

33-28-111

, shall investigate the complaint and may hold a suspension or revocation hearing.

If any person files a petition for an order directing payment from the real estate recovery account, the court may order payment out of the real estate recovery account under subsection (c) of this section if it finds:

The petitioner is not a spouse of the judgment debtor or a person representing the spouse;

The petitioner has obtained a judgment of the kind described in W.S. 33-28-202(a); and

The judgment debtor has insufficient property upon which execution may be levied to satisfy the judgment or that a writ of execution has been returned unsatisfied.

Upon receipt of an order by the court directing that payment be made out of the real estate recovery account, the state auditor shall draw a warrant for the payment of the amount directed upon a voucher approved by the commission and the state treasurer shall pay the amount directed out of the real estate recovery account.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

As to state treasurer, see art. 4, § 11, Wyo. Const., and §

9-1-401

.

As to state auditor, see art. 4, § 11, Wyo. Const., and §

9-1-401

.

§ 33-28-204.
Suspension of licenses following payment from account; reinstatement.

If the commission is required to make any payment from the real estate recovery account in settlement of a claim or toward the satisfaction of a judgment, the commission shall immediately suspend the judgment debtor’s license. The judgment debtor shall not be licensed by the commission or have his license reinstated by the commission until he has repaid in full the amount paid from the real estate recovery account with interest thereon of eighteen percent (18%) per annum. Repayment under this section shall not prohibit the commission from acting in accordance with W.S.

33-28-111

. A discharge in bankruptcy shall not relieve a person from the disabilities and penalties of the section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 1; 2017 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “as either a broker, associate broker or salesman” after “not be licensed,” and added the present third sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), added “by the commission” twice.

§ 33-28-205.
Subrogation of commission to rights of judgment creditor.

If, upon order of any court, the commission has caused payment to be made from the real estate recovery account to a judgment creditor, the commission is subrogated to the rights of the judgment creditor with respect to the amount so paid. Any recovery by the commission under this section shall be deposited in the real estate recovery account.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming real estate commission, see §

33-28-105

.

§ 33-28-206.
Fund balances; use of education fund and interest from recovery fund.

When the real estate recovery fund and education fund balances exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) each, the commission shall not collect annual fees under W.S. 33-28-201(b).

The commission may use the funds in the education fund, plus interest earned on the recovery fund, as appropriated by the legislature, for the purposes of raising the standards of practice in the real estate profession and the competency of licensees by:

Promoting the advancement of education and research in the field of real estate for the benefit of those licensed under this act;

Underwriting educational seminars and all other similar forms of educational projects for the benefit of licensees;

Establishing a chair in real estate or courses at Wyoming state institutions of higher learning for the purpose of making those courses available to businesses and the general public;

Contracting for particular education or research projects in the field of real estate to further the purposes of this section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 156, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-28-102(b)(lxii).